District of Columbia statutes.
32-708

Recordkeeping requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall maintain adequate records of declarations of domestic partnership, termination statements, and amendments to declarations of domestic partnership and termination statements.

(b)

The Mayor shall report annually to the Council on the number of domestic partnerships declared and terminated, including those terminated under § 32-702 (d)(5).

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-114, § 9, 39 DCR 2861
Apr. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-105, § 3(c), 63 DCR 217
1981 Ed., § 36-1407.
This section is referenced in § 32-702.